Utah statutes.
41-6a-1305.   Violation of rules -- Penalty.

(1)  An officer or employee of a school district who violates any of the rules provided under Section 41-6a-1304 or fails to include the obligation to comply with the rules in a contract executed by that person on behalf of a school district is guilty of misconduct and subject to removal from office or employment.

(2)  A person operating a school bus under contract with a school district who fails to comply with any rules provided under Section 41-6a-1304 is guilty of breach of contract, and the contract shall be canceled after notice and hearing by the responsible officers of the school district.

